Oklahoma, session 2025, SB219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-126 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Each school district and public charter school in this state


shall make menstrual products available, at no cost, in school


restrooms designated for use by females and single-occupancy


restrooms.


B. For the purposes of this section, “menstrual products” means


tampons and sanitary napkins for use in connection with the


menstrual cycle.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.



Req. No. 1253 Page 1


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1253 EB 12/30/2024 4:48:24 PM





































Req. No. 1253 Page 2